Illinois, session 104th, HB4373.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Motor 5Vehicle Glass Repair Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Advanced driver assistance system" means any motor 8vehicle electronic safety system, as outlined in the most 9recent version of SAE International's SAE J3016 Levels of 10Driving Automation, that is designed to support the driver and 11motor vehicle in a manner intended to:12        (1) increase motor vehicle safety; and13        (2) reduce losses associated with motor vehicle 14    crashes.15    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.16    "Insurance producer" means an individual or business 17entity required to be licensed under the laws of Illinois to 18sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance or annuity contracts. 19"Insurance producer" includes an agent, a managing general 20agent, a surplus lines broker, a reinsurance intermediary 21broker and manager, a rental vehicle agent and rental vehicle 22agent managing employee, and a consultant.23    "Insured" means a person that is entitled, or may be   HB4373 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1entitled, to receive first-party benefits or payments under an 2insurance policy.3    "Motor vehicle glass" means the glass and non-glass parts 4associated with the replacement of the glass used in the 5windshield, doors, or windows of a motor vehicle.6    "Motor vehicle glass repair shop" means any person, 7including an employee or agent of the person, that for 8consideration engages in the repair or replacement of damaged 9motor vehicle glass.10    "Notice" means direct written communications, including 11verifiable text, email, or application-based messaging that is 12easily accessible by the consumer. 13    "Person" means any individual or any corporation, limited 14liability company, partnership, association, or other group 15existing under or authorized by the laws of either this State 16or the United States.17    "Repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass" 18includes:19        (1) inspecting, repairing, restoring, or replacing 20    damaged motor vehicle glass; and21        (2) calibrating or recalibrating an advanced driver 22    assistance system when an incident requires the 23    replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.24    "Rights or benefits under the policy" includes the 25insured's right to receive any and all post-loss benefits or 26payments available or payable under the policy, including, but   HB4373 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1not limited to, claim payments. 2    Section 10. Application. This Act applies to insurance 3policies issued or renewed on or after the effective date of 4this Act. 5    Section 15. Post-loss benefit assignment.6    (a) An insured under a property and casualty insurance 7policy shall not, either prior to or after a claimed or covered 8loss, assign, delegate or otherwise transfer, in whole or in 9part, to any other person the insured's:10        (1) duties under the policy; or11        (2) rights or benefits under the policy.12    (b) Any contract entered in violation of this Section 13shall be void and unenforceable.14    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 15an insured from authorizing or directing payment to, or 16paying, a person for services, materials, or any other thing 17that may be, or is, covered under an insurance policy. 18    Section 20. Motor vehicle glass repair shop notice.19    (a) Prior to providing service to an insured for a repair 20or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass, a motor vehicle 21glass repair shop shall notify the insured of each of the 22following:23        (1) whether the motor vehicle has an advanced driver   HB4373 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1    assistance system; and2        (2) if the motor vehicle has an advanced driver 3    assistance system, then:4            (A) whether calibration or recalibration of the 5        motor vehicle's advanced driver assistance system is 6        needed after a windshield repair or replacement as 7        recommended by the vehicle manufacturer;8            (B) whether the motor vehicle glass repair shop 9        intends to calibrate or recalibrate the advanced 10        driver assistance system in a manner that meets the 11        motor vehicle manufacturer's specifications; and12            (C) that the motor vehicle should be taken to the 13        vehicle manufacturer's certified dealership or a 14        qualified specialist capable of performing the 15        calibration or recalibration if the motor vehicle 16        glass repair shop is not capable of performing or does 17        not intend to perform the calibration or recalibration 18        referenced in subparagraph (A).19    (b) If calibration or recalibration of the motor vehicle's 20advanced driver assistance system is performed, the motor 21vehicle glass repair shop shall provide written notice to the 22insured: 23        (1) as to whether the calibration or recalibration was 24    successful; and25        (2) that, if the calibration or recalibration was not 26    successful, the motor vehicle should be taken to the   HB4373 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1    vehicle manufacturer's certified dealership or a qualified 2    specialist capable of performing the calibration or 3    recalibration. 4    Section 25. Motor vehicle glass repair claims and 5practices.6    (a) A motor vehicle glass repair shop shall not contract 7with a person for a repair or replacement of damaged motor 8vehicle glass to be paid for under a first-party insurance 9policy until all of the following are satisfied:10        (1) the person has made a first-party claim for the 11    repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass under 12    a motor vehicle insurance policy;13        (2) the motor vehicle glass repair shop has received a 14    claim or referral number for the first-party claim; and15        (3) the requirements of subsection (a) of Section 20 16    have been satisfied.17    (b) A motor vehicle glass repair shop shall:18        (1) provide the insured a good faith estimate of the 19    fees and costs that are anticipated to be charged to the 20    insured by the motor vehicle glass repair shop for the 21    repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass;22        (2) prior to performing service, provide the insured 23    an updated estimate; and24        (3) not charge more than the reasonable and customary 25    fees and costs to an insured for a repair or replacement of   HB4373 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1    damaged motor vehicle glass and any associated calibration 2    or recalibration of the motor vehicle's advanced driver 3    assistance system as recommended by the vehicle 4    manufacturer specifications.5    (c) Upon completion of a repair or replacement of damaged 6motor vehicle glass, a motor vehicle glass repair shop shall 7provide the insured:8        (1) an itemized invoice and, upon payment, a receipt;9        (2) notice that states whether or not the advanced 10    driver assistance system was successfully calibrated or 11    recalibrated, if applicable; and12        (3) if the calibration or recalibration was not 13    successful, notice not to rely on the advanced driver 14    assistance system until it has been successfully 15    calibrated or recalibrated by the vehicle manufacturer's 16    certified dealership or a qualified specialist capable of 17    performing the calibration or recalibration. 18    Section 30. Prohibited acts.19    (a) A motor vehicle glass repair shop, or any other person 20who is compensated for the solicitation of insurance claims, 21shall not offer a rebate, gift, gift card, cash, coupon, fee, 22prize, bonus, payment, incentive, inducement, or any other 23thing of value to any insured, insurance producer, or other 24person in exchange for directing or making a claim under a 25motor vehicle insurance policy for a repair or replacement of   HB4373 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1damaged motor vehicle glass.2    (b) A motor vehicle glass repair shop shall not:3        (1) charge higher fees and costs to an insured for a 4    repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass than 5    are reasonable and customarily charged in this State;6        (2) submit false, misleading, or incomplete 7    documentation or information to an insured or an insured's 8    insurer, including any agent of the insured or insurer, 9    for a repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle 10    glass;11        (3) with respect to an insured's claim, or potential 12    claim, for a repair or replacement of damaged motor 13    vehicle glass, do the following, which results, or would 14    result, in a higher insurance payment or a change of 15    insurance coverage status:16            (A) indicate that work was performed in a 17        geographic area that was not the geographic area where 18        the work occurred; or19            (B) advise an insured to falsify the date of 20        damage;21        (4) falsely sign a work order or other 22    insurance-related form relating to an insured's claim, or 23    potential claim, for a repair or replacement of damaged 24    motor vehicle glass;25        (5) misrepresent to an insured or the insured's 26    insurer, including any agent of the insured or insurer,   HB4373 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1    the price of a proposed repair or replacement of damaged 2    motor vehicle glass;3        (6) state that an insured's insurer has approved a 4    repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass 5    without:6            (A) verifying coverage directly with, or obtaining 7        approval directly from, the insurer or the insurer's 8        agent; and9            (B) obtaining confirmation of the coverage or 10        approval by facsimile, email, or other written or 11        recorded communication;12        (7) state that a repair or replacement of damaged 13    motor vehicle glass will be paid for entirely by an 14    insurer and at no cost to the insured unless the coverage 15    has been verified by the insurer or the insurer's agent; 16    or17        (8) with respect to an insured's claim, or potential 18    claim, for a repair or replacement of damaged motor 19    vehicle glass:20            (A) damage, or encourage an insured to damage, the 21        motor vehicle in order to increase the scope of the 22        repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass;23            (B) perform work that is clearly and substantially 24        beyond the level of work necessary to restore the 25        motor vehicle to a safe pre-damaged condition in 26        accordance with accepted or approved reasonable and   HB4373 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1        customary techniques for the repair or replacement of 2        damaged motor vehicle glass; 3            (C) misrepresent the motor vehicle glass repair 4        shop's relationship to an insured or the insurer's 5        agent; or6            (D) perform any other act that constitutes fraud 7        or misrepresentation.8    (c) Any notice or invoice required under this Act shall be 9issued in the same font size as the invoice, estimate, or 10receipt. 11    Section 35. Right to choose motor vehicle glass repair 12shop.13    (a) An insured that makes a first-party claim for a repair 14or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass under a motor 15vehicle insurance policy shall not be required to use a 16particular motor vehicle glass repair shop to receive claim 17payments or other benefits under the policy.18    (b) This Section shall not be construed to:19        (1) prohibit an insurer, insurance producer, insurance 20    adjuster, or any person acting on behalf of an insurer, 21    insurance producer, or insurance adjuster from 22    recommending a motor vehicle glass repair shop or 23    providing an explanation to an insured of the coverage 24    available, and any applicable liability limit, under any 25    insurance policy;  HB4373 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 16506 BAB 29902 b1        (2) prohibit an insurer from maintaining a network of 2    motor vehicle glass repair shops; or3        (3) create a private cause of action. 4    Section 40. Presumption. It is presumed that a motor 5vehicle glass repair shop is acting knowingly in violation of 6Section 30 if the motor vehicle glass repair shop engages in a 7regular and consistent pattern of the prohibited activity. 8    Section 45. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 9necessary to administer and implement this Act, including 10rules to enforce compliance with this Act.